Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-4] Role of chief
election officer. (a) The chief election officer shall be the state
official responsible for implementing this chapter and the State's
responsibilities under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act,
42 U.S.C. section 1973ff et seq.

(b) The chief election officer shall establish
an electronic transmission system through which a covered voter may apply for
and receive voter registration materials, military-overseas ballots, and other
information under this chapter. The chief election officer may satisfy the
requirements of this chapter by utilizing an electronic transmission system
established by the Federal Voting Assistance Program in lieu of creating a
separate electronic transmission system.

(c) The chief election officer shall develop
standardized absentee-voting materials, including privacy and transmission
envelopes and their electronic equivalents, authentication materials, and
voting instructions, to be used with the military-overseas ballot of a voter authorized
to vote in any jurisdiction in this State.

(d) The chief election officer shall accept
forms prescribed by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42
U.S.C. section 1973ff et seq., for use by a covered voter [that] contains the prescribed
standard declaration to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to
the voter's identity, eligibility to vote, status as a covered voter, and
timely and proper completion of an overseas-military ballot. [L 2012, c 226, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next